Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Article 3. Additional State Retirement and Disability Benefits.
§ 25-11-115.
Options.

Upon application for superannuation or disability retirement, any member may elect to receive his or her benefit in a retirement allowance payable throughout life with no further payments to anyone at the member’s death, except that if the member’s total retirement payments under this article do not equal the member’s total contributions under this article, the named beneficiary shall receive the difference in cash at the member’s death. Or the member may elect upon retirement, or upon becoming eligible for retirement, to receive the actuarial equivalent subject to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section of his or her retirement allowance in a reduced retirement allowance payable throughout life with the provision that:

Option 1.If the retired member dies before he or she has received in annuity payment the value of the member’s annuity savings account as it was at the time of the member’s retirement, the balance shall be paid to the legal representative or to such person as the member has nominated by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the board;

Option 2.Upon the retired member’s death, his or her reduced retirement allowance shall be continued throughout the life of, and paid to, such person as the member has nominated by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the board of trustees at the time of his or her retirement;

Option 3.Upon the retired member’s death, one-half (1/2) of his or her reduced retirement allowance shall be continued throughout the life of, and paid to, such person as the member has nominated by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the board of trustees at the time of his or her retirement, and the other one-half (1/2) of his or her reduced retirement allowance to some other designated beneficiary;

Option 4.Upon the retired member’s death, three-fourths (3/4) of his or her reduced retirement allowance, or such other specified amount, shall be continued throughout the life of, and paid to, such person as the member has nominated by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the board of trustees at the time of his or her retirement;

Option 4-A.Upon the retired member’s death, one-half (1/2) of his or her reduced retirement allowance, or such other specified amount, shall be continued throughout the life of, and paid to, such person as the member has nominated by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the board of trustees at the time of his or her retirement;

Option 4-B.A reduced retirement allowance shall be continued throughout the life of the retirant, but with the further guarantee of payments to the named beneficiary or beneficiaries for a specified number of years certain. If the retired member or the last designated beneficiary both die before receiving all guaranteed payments due, the actuarial equivalent of the remaining payments shall be paid to the successors of the retired member under Section 25-11-117.1(1);

Option 6.Any member who became a member of the system before July 1, 2007, and who has at least twenty-eight (28) years of creditable service at the time of retirement or who is at least sixty-three (63) years of age and eligible to retire, may select the maximum retirement benefit or an optional benefit as provided in this subsection together with a partial lump-sum distribution. Any member who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2007, but before July 1, 2011, and who has at least twenty-eight (28) years of creditable service at the time of retirement may select the maximum retirement benefit or any optional benefit as provided in this subsection together with a partial lump-sum distribution. Any member who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2011, and who has at least thirty-three (33) years of creditable service at the time of retirement may select the maximum retirement benefit or any optional benefit as provided in this subsection together with a partial lump-sum distribution. The amount of the lump-sum distribution under this option shall be equal to the maximum monthly benefit multiplied by twelve (12), twenty-four (24) or thirty-six (36) as selected by the member. The maximum retirement benefit shall be actuarially reduced to reflect the amount of the lump-sum distribution selected and further reduced for any other optional benefit selected. The annuity and lump-sum distribution shall be computed to result in no actuarial loss to the system. The lump-sum distribution shall be made as a single payment payable at the time the first monthly annuity payment is paid to the retiree. The amount of the lump-sum distribution shall be deducted from the member’s annuity savings account in computing what contributions remain at the death of the retiree and/or a beneficiary. The lump-sum distribution option may be elected only once by a member upon initial retirement, and may not be elected by a retiree, by members applying for a disability retirement annuity, or by survivors.

No change in the option selected shall be permitted after the member’s death or after the member has received his or her first retirement check except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section and in Section 25-11-127. Members who are pursuing a disability retirement allowance and simultaneously or later elect to begin to receive a service retirement allowance while continuing to pursue a disability retirement allowance, shall not be eligible to select Option 6 and that option may not be selected at a later time if the application for a disability retirement allowance is voided or denied. However, any retired member who is receiving a retirement allowance under Option 2 or Option 4-A upon July 1, 1992, and whose designated beneficiary predeceased him or her or whose marriage to a spouse who is his or her designated beneficiary is terminated by divorce or other dissolution, upon written notification to the retirement system of the death of the designated beneficiary or of the termination of the retired member’s marriage to the designated beneficiary, the retirement allowance payable to the member after receipt of that notification by the retirement system shall be equal to the retirement allowance that would have been payable if the member had not elected the option. In addition, any retired member who is receiving the maximum retirement allowance for life, a retirement allowance under Option 1 or who is receiving a retirement allowance under Option 2 or Option 4-A on July 1, 1992, may elect to provide survivor benefits under Option 2 or Option 4-A to a spouse who was not previously the member’s beneficiary and whom the member married before July 1, 1992.

Any retired member who is receiving a reduced retirement allowance under Option 2, Option 4 or Option 4-A whose designated beneficiary predeceases him or her, or whose marriage to a spouse who is his or her designated beneficiary is terminated by divorce or other dissolution, may elect to cancel the reduced retirement allowance and receive the maximum retirement allowance for life in an amount equal to the amount that would have been payable if the member had not elected Option 2, Option 4 or Option 4-A. That election must be made in writing to the office of the executive director of the system on a form prescribed by the board. Any such election shall be effective the first of the month following the date the election is received by the system; however, the election may be applied retroactively for not more than three (3) months but no earlier than the first of the month following the date of the death of the beneficiary.

Any retired member who is receiving the maximum retirement allowance for life, or a retirement allowance under Option 1, and who marries after his or her retirement may elect to cancel the maximum retirement allowance and receive a reduced retirement allowance under Option 2, Option 4 or Option 4-A to provide continuing lifetime benefits to his or her spouse. That election must be made in writing to the office of the executive director of the system on a form prescribed by the board not earlier than the date of the marriage and not later than one (1) year from the date of the marriage. Any such election shall be effective the first of the month following the date the election is received by the system.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if the election of an optional benefit is made after the member has attained the age of sixty-five (65) years, the actuarial equivalent factor shall be used to compute the reduced retirement allowance as if the election had been made on his or her sixty-fifth birthday; however, from and after January 1, 2003, if there is an election of Option 6 after the member has attained the age of sixty-five (65) years, the actuarial equivalent factor based on the retiree’s age at the time of retirement shall be used to compute the reduced maximum monthly retirement allowance. However, if a retiree marries or remarries after retirement and elects either Option 2 or Option 4-A as provided in subsection (2) or (4) of this section, the actuarial equivalent factor used to compute the reduced retirement allowance shall be the factor for the age of the retiree and his or her beneficiary at the time such election for recalculation of benefits is made.

For members who retire on or after July 1, 2012, the actuarial equivalent factor used to compute the reduced retirement allowance at retirement or upon any subsequent recalculation of the benefit shall be the factor for the age of the retiree and his or her beneficiary at the time of retirement or at the time an election for recalculation of benefits is made.

Notwithstanding any provision of Section 25-11-1 et seq., no payments may be made for a retirement allowance on a monthly basis for a period of time in excess of that allowed by federal law.

If a retirant and his or her eligible beneficiary, if any, both die before they have received in annuity payments a total amount equal to the accumulated contributions standing to the retirant’s credit in the annuity savings account at the time of his or her retirement, the difference between the accumulated contributions and the total amount of annuities received by them shall be paid to such persons as the retirant has nominated by written designation duly executed and filed in the office of the executive director. If no designated person survives the retirant and his or her beneficiary, the difference, if any, shall be paid under Section 25-11-117.1(1).

Any retired member who retired on Option 2(5) or 4-A(5) before July 1, 1992, who is still receiving a retirement allowance on July 1, 1994, shall receive an increase in the annual retirement allowance effective July 1, 1994, equal to the amount they would have received under Option 2 or Option 4-A without a reduction for Option 5 based on the ages at retirement of the retiree and beneficiary and option factors in effect on July 1, 1992. That increase shall be prospective only.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7446-17; Laws, 1952, ch. 299, § 17; Laws, 1962, ch. 579, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 478, § 4; Laws, 1977, ch. 450, § 4; Laws, 1984, ch. 496, § 2; Laws, 1986, ch. 472; Laws, 1992, ch. 576, § 6; Laws, 1993, ch. 617, § 7; Laws, 1994, ch. 601, § 5; Laws, 1999, ch. 544, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 628, § 14; Laws, 2002, ch. 627, § 10; Laws, 2007, ch. 407, § 7; Laws, 2008, ch. 359, § 3; Laws, 2010, ch. 389, § 4; Laws, 2010, ch. 528, § 3; Laws, 2010, ch. 1, 1st Ex Sess § 3; Laws, 2011, ch. 369, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 397, § 13; Laws, 2017, ch. 338, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 25-11-115.1.
Designation of new spouse as beneficiary under Option 4-A; benefits payable to spouse.

Any retired member who died in 1993, who retired under Option 4-A before January 1, 1980, with his spouse as his designated beneficiary, whose spouse predeceased him, and who remarried before July 1, 1992, shall be deemed to have designated his new spouse as his beneficiary under Option 4-A before his death. Monthly survivor benefits to the member’s surviving spouse will be payable beginning on the first of the month after April 5, 1996. In addition, retroactive benefits will be payable to the surviving spouse back to the date of death of the retired member.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 472, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 5, 1996).

§ 25-11-115.2.
Benefit payments not knowingly to be paid directly to legally incompetent persons; representative payees.

It is the intent of the Public Employees’ Retirement System to provide benefit payments in an efficient manner consistent with the member’s best interest. The system shall not knowingly allow payments to be made directly to persons who are determined legally incompetent or incapable of managing or directing the management of benefits. Any person applying for or receiving benefits who comes to be known as incapable of applying for, managing or directing the management of benefits by reason of mental or physical impairment, as certified by a medical doctor, shall be directed to obtain a conservator or legal guardian for purposes of applying for, receiving, managing and/or directing benefit payments. In the absence of a conservator or legal guardian or valid durable power of attorney, the Public Employees’ Retirement System may designate a representative payee for such purposes. The benefit recipient may nominate a representative payee for consideration by the system in selecting a payee, and the system is responsible for selecting a payee, including an agency, organization, or institution, that will serve the interest of the benefit recipient. The system may also accept the Social Security Administration’s designation of a representative payee to manage and direct funds paid by the system. The system shall have the authority to establish rules for the administration of this section.

A representative payee shall be directed to apply benefits paid from the system only for the use and benefit of the benefit recipient. The system’s obligations to a benefit recipient shall be discharged when it makes a correct payment to a representative payee on the benefit recipient’s behalf. The system is without liability for the theft or misuse of benefits if the benefits were properly paid based upon the information available to the system at the time the payments were made.

In the absence of a conservator, legal guardian or valid durable power of attorney, an unmarried benefit applicant who is deemed to be incapable of applying for, managing or directing his or her benefits, shall be entitled to receive annuity payments in an amount equal to a retirement allowance based on the maximum benefit payable to the member for life and with any remaining benefit at the death of the member payable pursuant to Section 25-11-117.1(1). Such payments shall be paid to the representative payee, designated by the system in accordance with the provisions of this section during the period of the benefit recipient’s incapacity.

In the absence of a conservator, legal guardian or valid durable power of attorney, any married benefit applicant who is deemed to be incapable of applying for, managing or directing his or her benefits, shall be paid a reduced retirement allowance under Option 2 as provided in Section 25-11-115, with the lawful spouse as the beneficiary. Such payments shall be paid to a representative payee as designated by the system in accordance with the provisions of this section during the period of the benefit recipient’s incapacity.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 628, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 25-11-116.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2008, ch. 359, § 12, effective July 1, 2008.

§25-11-116. [Laws, 1986, ch. 500, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 18, 1986).]

§ 25-11-117.
Refund of contributions; distribution to retirement plan or account; repayment of refund.

A member may be paid a refund of the amount of accumulated contributions to the credit of the member in the annuity savings account, provided that the member has withdrawn from state service and has not returned to state service on the date the refund of the accumulated contributions would be paid. That refund of the contributions to the credit of the member in the annuity savings account shall be paid within ninety (90) days from receipt in the office of the retirement system of the properly completed form requesting the payment. In the event of death before retirement of any member whose spouse and/or children are not entitled to a retirement allowance, the accumulated contributions to the credit of the deceased member in the annuity savings account shall be paid to the designated beneficiary on file in writing in the office of the executive director of the board of trustees within ninety (90) days from receipt of a properly completed form requesting the payment. If there is no such designated beneficiary on file for the deceased member in the office of the system, upon the filing of a proper request with the board, the contributions to the credit of the deceased member in the annuity savings account shall be refunded under Section 25-11-117.1(1). The payment of the refund shall discharge all obligations of the retirement system to the member on account of any creditable service rendered by the member before the receipt of the refund. By the acceptance of the refund, the member shall waive and relinquish all accrued rights in the system.

Under the Unemployment Compensation Amendments of 1992 (Public Law 102-318 (UCA)), a member or the spouse of a member who is an eligible beneficiary entitled to a refund under this section may elect, on a form prescribed by the board under rules and regulations established by the board, to have an eligible rollover distribution of accumulated contributions payable under this section paid directly to an eligible retirement plan, as defined under applicable federal law, or an individual retirement account. If the member or the spouse of a member who is an eligible beneficiary makes that election and specifies the eligible retirement plan or individual retirement account to which the distribution is to be paid, the distribution will be made in the form of a direct trustee-to-trustee transfer to the specified eligible retirement plan. A nonspouse beneficiary may elect to have an eligible rollover distribution paid in the form of a direct trustee-to-trustee transfer to an individual retirement account established to receive the distribution on behalf of the nonspouse beneficiary. Flexible rollovers under this subsection shall not be considered assignments under Section 25-11-129.

If any person who has received a refund, reenters the state service and again becomes a member of the system before July 1, 2007, the member may repay all or part of the amounts previously received as a refund, together with regular interest covering the period from the date of refund to the date of repayment; however, the amounts that are repaid by the member and the creditable service related thereto shall not be used in any benefit calculation or determination until the member has remained a contributor to the system for a period of at least four (4) years after the member’s reentry into state service. Repayment for that time shall be made beginning with the most recent service for which refund has been made. Upon the repayment of all or part of that refund and interest, the member shall again receive credit for the period of creditable service for which full repayment has been made to the system.

If any person who has received a refund, reenters the state service and again becomes a member of the system on or after July 1, 2007, the member may repay all or part of the amounts previously received as a refund, together with regular interest covering the period from the date of refund to the date of repayment; however, the amounts that are repaid by the member and the creditable service related thereto shall not be used in any benefit calculation or determination until the member has remained a contributor to the system for a period of at least eight (8) years after the member’s reentry into state service. Repayment for that time shall be made beginning with the most recent service for which refund has been made. Upon the repayment of all or part of that refund and interest, the member shall again receive credit for the period of creditable service for which full repayment has been made to the system.

In order to provide a source of income to members who have applied for disability benefits under Section 25-11-113 or 25-11-114, the board may provide, at the employee’s election, a temporary benefit to be paid from the member’s accumulated contributions, if any, without forfeiting the right to pursue disability benefits, provided that the member has exhausted all personal and medical leave and has terminated his or her employment. The board may prescribe rules and regulations for carrying out the provisions of this subsection (4).

If a member who has elected to receive temporary benefits under this subsection later applies for a refund of his or her accumulated contributions, all amounts paid under this subsection shall be deducted from the accumulated contributions and the balance will be paid to the member. If a member who has elected to receive temporary benefits under this subsection is later approved for a disability retirement allowance, and a service retirement allowance or survivor benefits are paid on the account, the board shall adjust the benefits in such a manner that no more than the actuarial equivalent of the benefits to which the member or beneficiary was or is entitled shall be paid.

The board may study, develop and propose a disability benefit structure, including short- and long-term disability benefits, provided that it is the actuarial equivalent of the benefits currently provided in Section 25-11-113 or 25-11-114.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7446-18; Laws, 1952, ch. 299, § 18; Laws, 1977, ch. 450, § 5; Laws, 1984, ch. 496, § 3; Laws, 1991, ch. 513, § 7; Laws, 1993, ch. 617, § 8; Laws, 1995, ch. 624, § 4; Laws, 1999, ch. 544, § 3; Laws, 2000, ch. 628, § 15; Laws, 2001, ch. 438, § 2; Laws, 2002, ch. 313, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 445, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 407, § 8; Laws, 2008, ch. 359, § 5; Laws, 2016, ch. 397, § 14; Laws, 2017, ch. 338, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 25-11-117.1.
Persons to whom benefits payable in event of death of designated beneficiary.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, where benefits are payable to a designated beneficiary or beneficiaries under this article and the designated beneficiary or beneficiaries as provided by the member on the most recent form filed with the system is deceased or otherwise disqualified at the time such benefits become payable, the following persons, in descending order of precedence, shall be eligible to receive such benefits:

The surviving spouse of the member or retiree;

The children of the member or retiree or their descendants, per stirpes;

The brothers and sisters of the member or retiree or their descendants, per stirpes;

The parents of the member or retiree;

The executor or administrator on behalf of the member or retiree’s estate;

The persons entitled by law to distribution of the member or retiree’s estate.

Any monthly benefits payable to a beneficiary who dies prior to cashing his or her final check(s) and/or any additional benefits payable pursuant to Section 25-11-112 still payable at the death of a beneficiary receiving monthly benefits shall be paid as follows:

The surviving spouse of the beneficiary;

The children of the beneficiary or their descendants, per stirpes;

The brothers and sisters of the beneficiary or their descendants, per stirpes;

The parents of the beneficiary;

The executor or administrator on behalf of the beneficiary’s estate;

The persons entitled by law to distribution of the beneficiary’s estate.

In the event no claim is made by any individual listed in subsection (2) of this section, a distribution may be made pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section.

Payment under the provisions of this section shall bar recovery by any other person of the benefits distributed. Payment of benefits made to one or more members of a class of individuals are made on behalf of all members of the class. Any members of the class coming forward after payment is made must look to those who received the payment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 628, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 25-11-118.
Retirement system authorized to accept eligible roll over distributions to repay fund or for purchase of optional service credit.

Effective July 1, 2000, and subject to the rules adopted by the board of trustees, the system shall accept an eligible rollover distribution or a direct transfer of funds from another eligible retirement plan, as defined under applicable federal law, or an individual retirement account, in payment of all or a portion of the cost to purchase optional service credit or to reinstate previously withdrawn service credit as permitted by the system. The system may only accept rollover payments in an amount equal to or less than the balance due for purchase or reinstatement of service credit. The rules adopted by the board of trustees shall condition the acceptance of a rollover or transfer from another eligible retirement plan or an individual retirement account on the receipt of information necessary to enable the system to determine the eligibility of any transferred funds for tax-free rollover treatment or other treatment under federal income tax law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 544, § 4; Laws, 2002, ch. 313, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 14, 2002.).

§ 25-11-119.
Administration of Article 3.

The board shall keep such data as shall be necessary for actuarial valuation of the assets and liabilities of the system and for checking its operating experience.

The board shall keep minutes which shall be open to public inspection. It shall have the accounts of the system audited annually by the State Audit Department and shall publish as of the end of each fiscal year a report showing the fiscal transactions of the system for the preceding fiscal year, the amount of the accumulated cash and securities of the system, a statement of income and expenditures, a statement of investments acquired and disposed of, and a balance sheet showing the financial condition of the system by means of an actuarial valuation of its assets and liabilities. It shall also publish a synopsis of the report.

The board shall establish a general office for the meeting of the board and for the administrative personnel; provide for the installation of an adequate system of books, accounts, and records which will give effect to all requirements of Articles 1 and 3; and credit all assets received by the funds according to the purposes for which they are held. All books, accounts and records shall be kept in the general office of the board and shall be public records except for individual member records. The system shall not disclose the name, address or contents of any individual member records without the prior written consent of the individual to whom the record pertains, except as authorized by regulations of the board.

The board shall hold regular meetings at least quarterly in each year and such special meetings as may be deemed necessary. All meetings shall be open to the public.

The board shall have power to make contracts, and to sue and be sued, under the name of the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi.

Legal advisor. The Attorney General shall be the legal advisor of the board; and the board may employ counsel when needed.

Medical board. The board may designate a medical board to be composed of three (3) physicians or may contract with another governmental agency or nongovernmental disability determination service that is qualified to make disability determinations. If required, other physicians may be engaged to report on special cases. The medical board or other governmental or nongovernmental disability determination service agency so designated shall arrange for, and pass upon, all medical examinations required under the provisions of this article; shall investigate all essential statements and certificates by or on behalf of a member in connection with an application for disability retirement; and shall report in writing to the board of trustees its conclusions and recommendations upon all the matters referred to it.

Duties of actuary. The board of trustees shall designate an actuary who shall be the technical advisor of the board on matters regarding the operation of the system, and shall perform such other duties as are required in connection therewith.

At least once in each two-year period, the actuary shall make an actuarial survey of the mortality, service, withdrawal and compensation experience of the members and beneficiaries of the retirement system, and shall make a valuation of the assets and liabilities of the system. Taking into account the result of such investigation and valuation, the board of trustees shall adopt for the retirement system such mortality, service, and other tables as shall be deemed necessary. On the basis of such tables as the board of trustees shall adopt, the actuary shall make valuations of the assets and liabilities of the funds of the system.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7446-19; Laws, 1952, ch. 299, § 19; Laws, 1985, ch. 325, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 513, § 8; Laws, 1995, ch. 624, § 5; Laws, 2008, ch. 359, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 25-11-119.1.
On-site compliance audits of employers by Public Employees’ Retirement System; penalties.

The system may perform on-site compliance audits of employers to determine compliance with reporting, contributions, and certification requirements under this title.

The system may request records to be provided by the employer at the time of the audit.

Audits shall be conducted at the sole discretion of the system after reasonable notice to the employer of at least five (5) working days.

The employer shall extract and provide records as requested by the office in an appropriate, organized and usable format.

Failure of an employer to allow access, provide records or comply in any way with an audit by the system under this section shall result in the employer being liable to the system for:

Any liabilities and expenses, including administrative expenses and travel expenses, resulting from the employer’s failure to comply with the audit; and

A penalty equal to one percent (1%) of the employer’s contribution for the month preceding the notification of the audit.

If the audit reveals an employer’s failure to make contributions as required under Section 25-11-124, a failure to correctly report eligibility as required under Section 25-11-103(s), or a failure to maintain records as required under the rules and regulations of the system, the employer shall reimburse the system for the cost of the audit.

The executive director may waive all or any part of the penalties and expenses if the executive director finds there were extenuating circumstances surrounding the employer’s failure to comply with this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2016, ch. 397, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 25-11-120.
Hearings and appeals for persons aggrieved by administrative determination relating to eligibility, payment of benefits or calculation of creditable service.

Any individual aggrieved by an administrative determination, including a determination of the medical board, relating to the eligibility for or payment of benefits, or the calculation of creditable service or other similar matters relating to the Public Employees’ Retirement System or any other retirement system or program administered by the board, may request a hearing before a hearing officer designated by the board. Such hearings shall be conducted in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board and formal rules of evidence shall not apply. The hearing officer is authorized to administer oaths, hear testimony of witnesses and receive documentary and other evidence. In case of disability appeals, the hearing officer shall have the authority to defer a decision in order to request a medical evaluation or test or additional existing medical records not previously furnished by the claimant. After the hearing and the receipt of any additional medical evidence requested by the hearing officer, the hearing officer shall certify the record to the board, which shall include the hearing officer’s proposed statement of facts, conclusions of law and recommendation. The record may include a taped recording of the proceedings of the hearing in lieu of a transcribed copy of the proceedings. The board shall receive the record and make its determination based solely on matters contained therein.

Any individual aggrieved by the determination of the board may appeal to the Circuit Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, in accordance with the Uniform Circuit Court Rules governing appeals to the circuit court in civil cases. Such appeal shall be made solely on the record before the board and this procedure shall be the exclusive method of appealing determinations of the board.

The board is authorized to appoint a committee of the board to serve as hearing officer or to employ or contract with qualified personnel to perform the duties of hearing officer and court reporter as may be necessary for conducting, recording and transcribing such hearings. The board may assess and collect fees to offset costs related to such hearings. Those fees shall be deposited to the credit of the Public Employees’ Retirement System.

Interest shall not be paid on any benefits, including, but not limited to, benefits that are delayed as a result of an administrative determination or an appeal from an administrative determination.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 624, § 6; Laws, 1999, ch. 544, § 5; Laws, 2002, ch. 627, § 11; Laws, 2010, ch. 528, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2010.